District of Columbia statutes.
47-1381

Judgment bars redemption only in real property described therein.

If a plaintiff who files a complaint to foreclose the right of redemption describes the real property in the complaint in a manner other than that contained in the certificate of sale or states an incorrect street address, and the description in the judgment, the description in the complaint, and the description in the certificate of sale are intended to describe the same real property, the judgment entered barring the defendant’s right to redeem bars the defendant’s interest only in the real property described in the judgment.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334

History

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).

Emergency Legislation